da: Hjem og have > Indretning > Vasefyld og bordpynt: Bordpynt; Vasefyld
ru: Дом и сад > Декор > Наполнители для ваз и конфетти для украшения стола: Конфетти для украшения стола; Наполнители для ваз
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Dekor > Vazo Dolguları ve Masaüstü Süsleme Taşları: Masaüstü Süsleme Taşları; Vazo Dolguları
cs: Dům a zahrada > Bytové doplňky a dekorace > Výplně váz a dekorace na stůl: Konfety na stůl; Dekorační materiál do vázy
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 裝飾用品 > 花瓶填充物和桌檯裝飾品: 桌面裝飾; 花瓶填充物
vi: Nhà và vườn > Trang trí > Đồ trang trí lọ hoa và bàn: Đồ trang trí bàn; Đồ trang trí lọ hoa
en: Home & Garden > Decor > Vase Fillers & Table Scatters: Table Scatters; Vase Fillers
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Dekoracije > Punila za vaze i posipi za stol: Posipi za stol; Punila za vaze
nl: Huis en tuin > Decoratie > Opvulmateriaal voor vazen en losse tafeldecoratie: Losse tafeldecoratie; Opvulmateriaal voor vazen
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Dekorácie > Dekoračné guličky do vázy a stolové konfety: Stolové konfety; Dekoračné guličky do vázy
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Koristeet > Maljakon koristetäytteet ja pöytäkoristeet: Pöytäkoristeet; Maljakon koristetäytteet
es: Casa y jardín > Decoración > Rellenos para jarrones y decoraciones para mesas: Esparcidores de mesa; Rellenos de jarrones
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Декорация > Декоративни камъчета за вази и маси: Декоративни камъчета за маса; Декоративни камъчета за ваза
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Pedras decorativas: Decorações de mesa; Enchimentos de vasos
fr: Maison et jardin > Décorations > Cailloux de table et matériaux de remplissage pour vases: Décorations de table; Remplisseurs de vases
de: Heim & Garten > Dekoration > Vasenfüller & Streudeko: Streudeko; Vasenfüller
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Enchimentos para jarras e dispersão de mesa: Dispersão de mesa; Enchimentos para jarras
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Διακόσμηση > Γεμίσματα για βάζα & διακοσμητικά τραπεζιού: Διακοσμητικά τραπεζιού; Γεμίσματα για βάζα
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > インテリア・エクステリア > 装飾用ストーン・ビー玉: テーブルスキャッター; 花瓶フィラー
pl: Dom i ogród > Ozdoby > Przedmioty ozdobne do wazonów i kamienie dekoracyjne: Dekoracje stołu; Ozdoby do wazonów
th: บ้านและสวน > ของประดับตกแต่ง > สิ่งที่เติมใส่แจกันและเครื่องประดับแบบกระจายบนโต๊ะ: เครื่องประดับแบบกระจายบนโต๊ะ; สิ่งที่เติมใส่แจกัน
hu: Otthon és kert > Dekoráció > Vázatöltők és asztali szóróanyagok: Asztali szóróanyagok; Vázatöltők
nb: Hjem og hage > Dekor > Vasefyllere og bordpynt: Bordspredere; Fyllstoff for vaser
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Dekoras > Vazų užpildai ir dekoratyviniai stalo pabarstai: Dekoratyviniai stalo pabarstai; Vazų užpildai
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 실내 장식 > 꽃병 필러/테이블 장식용품: 테이블 장식용품; 꽃병 필러
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Decorațiuni > Accesorii decorative pentru vaze și decorațiuni pentru masă: Decorațiuni pentru masă; Accesorii decorative pentru vaze
sv: Hem och trädgård > Dekor > Vasutfyllnad och bordsdekorationer: Bordsdekorationer; Vasutfyllnad
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dekoracija > Polnila za vaze in okrasni elementi za mizo: Okrasni posipi za mizo; Polnila za vaze
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 装饰 > 花瓶填充料/珠子/石头等: 桌面分散饰物; 花瓶填充料
it: Casa e giardino > Arredo > Materiali di riempimento per vasi e decorazioni per tavoli: Decorazioni per tavole; Materiali di riempimento per vasi